Missouri, session 2026, HB3052.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 407.1095, 407.1098, 407.1101, 407.1104, and 407.1110, RSMo,
are repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 407.1095,
407.1098, 407.1101, 407.1104, and 407.1110, to read as follows:
407.1095. As used in sections 407.1095 to 407.1110, the following words and phrases
mean:
(1) "Business subscriber", a person or entity that, for primarily business use, has
subscribed to telephone service, wireless service, or other similar service;
(2) "Caller identification service", a type of telephone service which permits
telephone subscribers to see the telephone number of incoming telephone calls;
[(2)] (3) "Residential subscriber", a person who, for primarily personal and familial
use, has subscribed to residential telephone service, wireless service or similar service, or the
other persons living or residing with such person;
[(3)] (4) "Telephone solicitation", any voice, facsimile, short messaging service
(SMS), or multimedia messaging service (MMS), for the purpose of encouraging the
purchase or rental of, or investment in, property, goods or services, but does not include
communications:
(a) To any residential or business subscriber with that subscriber's prior express
invitation or permission;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3052 2
(b) By or on behalf of any person or entity with whom a residential or business
subscriber has had a business contact within the past one hundred eighty days or a current
business or personal relationship;
(c) By or on behalf of an entity organized pursuant to Chapter 501 (c)(3) of the United
States Internal Revenue Code, while such entity is engaged in fund-raising to support the
charitable purpose for which the entity was established provided that a bona fide member of
such exempt organization makes the voice communication;
(d) By or on behalf of any entity over which a federal agency has regulatory authority
to the extent that:
a. Subject to such authority, the entity is required to maintain a license, permit or
certificate to sell or provide the merchandise being offered through telemarketing; and
b. The entity is required by law or rule to develop and maintain a no-call list;
(e) By a natural person responding to a referral, or working from his or her primary
residence, or a person licensed by the state of Missouri to carry out a trade, occupation or
profession who is setting or attempting to set an appointment for actions relating to that
licensed trade, occupation or profession within the state or counties contiguous to the state.
407.1098. No person or entity shall make or cause to be made any telephone
solicitation to any residential or business subscriber in this state who has given notice to the
attorney general, in accordance with rules promulgated pursuant to section 407.1101 of such
subscriber's objection to receiving telephone solicitations.
407.1101. 1. The attorney general shall establish and provide for the operation of a
database to compile a list of telephone numbers of residential or business subscribers who
object to receiving telephone solicitations. [Such list is not intended to include any telephone
number primarily used for business or commercial purposes.]
2. The attorney general shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the
establishment of a state no-call database as he or she deems necessary and appropriate to fully
implement the provisions of sections 407.1095 to 407.1110. The rules and regulations shall
include those which:
(1) Specify the methods by which each residential or business subscriber may give
notice to the attorney general or its contractor of his or her objection to receiving such
solicitations or revocation of such notice. There shall be no cost to the subscriber for joining
the database;
(2) Specify the length of time for which a notice of objection shall be effective and
the effect of a change of telephone number on such notice;
(3) Specify the methods by which such objections and revocations shall be collected
and added to the database;

HB 3052 3
(4) Specify the methods by which any person or entity desiring to make telephone
solicitations will obtain access to the database as required to avoid calling the telephone
numbers of residential or business subscribers included in the database, including the cost
assessed to that person or entity for access to the database;
(5) Specify such other matters relating to the database that the attorney general deems
desirable.
3. If the Federal Communications Commission establishes a single national database
of telephone numbers of subscribers who object to receiving telephone solicitations pursuant
to 47 U.S.C. Section 227(c)(3), the attorney general shall include that part of such single
national database that relates to Missouri in the database established pursuant to this section.
4. Information contained in the database established pursuant to this section shall be
used only for the purpose of compliance with section 407.1098 and this section or in a
proceeding or action pursuant to section 407.1107. Such information shall not be considered
a public record pursuant to chapter 610.
5. In April, July, October and January of each year, the attorney general shall be
encouraged to obtain subscription listings of residential or business subscribers in this state
who have arranged to be included on any national do-not-call list and add those telephone
numbers to the state do-not-call list.
6. The attorney general may utilize moneys appropriated from general revenue and
moneys appropriated from the merchandising practices revolving fund established in section
407.140 for the purposes of establishing and operating the state no-call database.
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in sections 407.1095 to 407.1110 shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date
or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2000, shall be invalid
and void.
407.1104. 1. Any person or entity who makes a telephone solicitation to any
residential or businesssubscriber in this state shall, at the beginning of such solicitation, state
clearly the identity of the person or entity initiating the solicitation.
2. No person or entity who makes a telephone solicitation to a residential or business
subscriber in this state shall knowingly use any method to block or otherwise circumvent any
subscriber's use of a caller identification service.
407.1110. The attorney general shall establish an advisory group composed of
government entities, local telecommunications companies, businesses, and senior citizen and

HB 3052 4
other community advocates to compile and promote a list of educational literature to help
consumers understand their options with regard to telephone solicitations. The attorney
general shall work with local exchange telecommunications companies to disseminate to their
residential or business subscribers information about the availability of and instructions
about how to request educational literature from the attorney general. The attorney general
may enter into agreements with those companies for the purpose of dissemination of the
educational literature. The attorney general shall include on his or her internet website
information that informs residential or business subscribers of their rights to be placed on a
no-call list and the various methods, including notice to the attorney general, of placing their
names on this no-call list. The attorney general shall have this literature developed for
dissemination to the public no later than January 1, 2001.
✔